Hawaii statutes.
[§46-1.8] Reciprocal supplying of tax
information. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a tax official
of any county of the State may disclose any records relating to the
administration of real property taxes to any duly accredited tax official of
the State for tax purposes. [L Sp 2005, c 9, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 246A but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next